Tennessee, session 114, HB1057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as "The Parole Advancement and
Reintegration Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 28, Part 6, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The department shall develop an early parole termination program for
parolees who have:
(1) Maintained stable and verifiable employment for at least six (6)
consecutive months;
(2) Remained law-abiding and free of any violations or arrests while on
parole; and
(3) Completed all rehabilitation and treatment programs as required by
the sentencing court and the department.
(b) The program must:
(1) Include an earned time credit system that is substantially similar to
the sentence reduction credits available to inmates under § 41-21-236, and
provide for a gradual reduction of supervision with a goal of full discharge from
parole after five (5) years in the program;
(2) Require parolees to be assessed twice a year as to eligibility for
participation in the program; and
HB1057
003146
- 1 -

(3) Include criteria for a parolee to achieve early termination of and final
discharge from parole by the director of probation and parole.
SECTION 3. The department of correction is authorized to promulgate rules to
effectuate this act. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform
Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003146